North Dakota statutes. TITLE 31 Judicial Proof
CHAPTER 31-02 Examination of Adverse Parties [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

31-02-01.
Action for discovery abolished — Provisions of chapter exclusive. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(c).

31-02-02.
Cross-examination of adverse party on trial of civil matter — Conclusiveness of testimony. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 43(b).

31-02-03.
Examination of adverse party before trial — Notice — Reference — Compelling attendance. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(a), now Rules 30(a), 31(a).

31-02-04.
Taking and filing of testimony of examination before trial required — Readable in evidence by whom. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(d), now Rules 32(a), 32(c), and Rule 26(f).

31-02-05.
Refusal to testify punishable as contempt and pleading may be stricken. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 37(b), (d).

31-02-06.
Party may be examined on own behalf. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(a), 27(a), 43(b), now Rules 30(a), 31(a), 27(a), 43(b).